Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1228 of Title 20, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A county law library, its board of trustees, or any
employees of such shall be represented without charge in any legal
matter that relates to the official duties or operations of such law
library by the district attorney in whose district such law library
is located.
B. If the district attorney is unable to represent a county law
library due to a conflict of interest, the Office of the Attorney
General shall, without charge, provide any required legal
representation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1621 Page 2